myspell/de_DE.dic
abgeleugnet/A
abgestumpft/AC
absetzbar/AU
administrativ/A
Afghane/FN
Ähnlichkeit/PU
Aktionär/EPSF
Alleininhaber/FNS
altruistisch/A
Amerikaner/FNS
Analytiker/SNF
Änderungszeit/PV
angefochten/AU
angekleidet/A
angepasst/ACU
angestürmt/A
Angreifer/FNS
annehmbar/AU
Ansager/FNS
antworten/DIVXY
antwortet/G
Arbeitnehmer/FNS
arbeitsaufwändig/A
arm/A
artig/ACU
Atheist/FP
auffällig/ACU
aufgehetzt/A
aufgeklärt/AU
aufgewickelt/A
ausführbar/AU
Ausgeglichenheit/U
ausgeholfen/A
ausgespült/AU
ausgestreut/A
Ausländer/FNS
Äußerung/PV
Autor/FPS
bahnt/G
bannen/DIVXY
Bauarbeiter/FNS
beabsichtigt/AU
bebt/G
bedachtsam/A
bedeutend/ACU
befangen/AU
beflissen/AL
begehbar/AU
Begründer/FNS
begründet/AU
Bein/EPSTM
beißen/DIVX
bekannt/ACLU
beladen/ADI
belastet/AU
benannt/AU
Bergsteiger/FNS
beschädigt/AU
besinnlich/ACU
besterhalten/A
Bestimmtheit/U
Betreuer/FNS
bettelt/G
Bett/TM
beugen/DIVXY
bewohnt/AU
Bierfass/TM
Bieter/FNS
Bild/RTM
billigen/DIVXY
birgt/VX
bitter/ACL
bleiben/DIVXW
bleihaltig/A
blühen/DIVXY
blüht/G
Botaniker/FNS
boten/G
bot/VZ
brauchen/DGIVXY
Brauch/STV
Brett/RSTM
bricht/VX
Brite/FN
brutal/ACU
Buchung/VP
buntfarben/A
Bürger/FNS
Butterfass/TM
Chefsekretär/EFPS
dampfen/DIVXY
dampft/G
Darsteller/FNS
demonstrativ/A
denkbar/AU
Diabetiker/FNS
dichten/DIVXY
dolmetschen/DIVXY
Doppelung/PV
Dortmunder/SNF
döst/G
drehen/BDIVXY
dreieinhalbfach/A
drucken/BDIVXY
Duldsamkeit/U
dünkt/G
durchgeschwommen/A
Ehegatte/FN
ehelichen/DIVXY
ehrerbietig/ACU
eigen/AL
einflussreich/AC
eingeschifft/A
einig/AU
einigen/DIVXY
Einzel/H
Einzelhändler/FNS
einzig/A
Endlichkeit/U
Engel/NSM
Entdecker/FNS
entladen/ADI
Entschiedenheit/U
erben/DIVXY
Erdnuss/pM
erheblich/ACU
Ernährungswissenschaftler/FNS
ernst/ACL
erratisch/A
erschrocken/AU
erwünscht/ACU
Esel/NSM
Europameister/FNS
ewig/AL
exquisit/A
Fall/STV
fallsüchtig/AG
Fälscher/NSFV
fassen/BDIVXY
fastet/G
fein/ACU
Fenster/NSM
Fernfahrer/FNS
fernmündlich/A
Feuer/JSM
fichtst/VX
fiebert/G
Film/STM
flaggt/G
flattert/G
Flicker/FNS
flitzt/G
flog/VZ
flucht/G
Fluss/TpM
folgt/G
förmlich/ACU
Frankfurter/FS
Frau/MP
Freiheit/PU
Friedenstifter/FNS
frieren/DGIVX
fruchtbar/ACU
fügt/G
Fürst/FP
Gabe/NV
gackert/G
gähnt/G
gangbar/ACU
Gastwirt/EFPS
geblieben/A
gebraucht/AU
Geduld/U
gefiedert/A
Geflügelhändler/FNS
gehalten/AU
gehörig/AU
geisterhaft/AC
gelb/AL
gelegen/ALU
gelöscht/AU
gelungen/A
Gemahl/FS
geniert/AU
geprüft/AU
gepuscht/A
gerichtet/AU
geschämt/A
Geschichte/NM
geschickt/ACU
geschult/AU
geschwommen/A
Gesellschafter/FNS
gestraft/AU
gestresst/A
getreu/AL
getypt/AU
gewahrt/AW
gezeichnet/AU
gezwinkert/A
gibt/VXW
glänzt/G
glaubwürdig/ACU
glimpflich/AU
glotzt/G
gönnen/DIVXY
Gott/HT
Göttin/F
griffig/AC
Großenkel/FNS
grübelt/G
gucken/DIXYWV
günstig/ACU
haftet/G
haltlos/ACG
hältst/VX
handgeknüpft/A
Handkuss/TpM
Handwerker/FNS
hätscheln/DIVXY
haust/G
Hebel/NSM
Heide/FN
Heim/EMPST
heimlich/ACU
herangetragen/A
Herausgeber/FNS
herrscht/G
heruntergeladen/A
Herz/PM
heult/G
hexen/DIVXY
hinuntergeschluckt/A
hofft/G
höherverzinst/A
Holländer/FNS
huldigt/G
hüllen/DIVXY
hupt/G
Immigrant/FP
industrieorientiert/A
Inhaber/FNS
Insel/NM
irrsinnig/AC
irrt/G
Jäger/FNS
juckt/G
Junggeselle/FN
Kamerad/FP
kam/VZ
karibisch/A
Kassierer/FNS
kehren/DIVXY
keift/G
Kern/EPSM
keucht/G
keusch/ACU
Kieler/FNS
Kind/HMRT
klafft/G
klang/VZ
klappert/G
klatscht/G
Kleid/JRM
klimpert/G
klirrt/G
klügste/A
knallen/DIVXY
knallt/G
Kneipenwirt/EFP
knirscht/G
knurrt/G
kompliziert/ACU
Konfirmand/FP
kontrollierbar/AU
koppeln/BDIVXY
Kosmetiker/FNS
kostet/G
kräftigt/G
krault/G
Kräuter/NU
Kreuz/EPTJM
kriegt/G
kümmern/DIVXY
kundig/AU
Kürschner/FNS
lacht/G
Laden/JSV
lästert/G
laufen/DIV
laut/ACL
lecker/A
leihen/DIVXW
Leiter/NSF
letzt/AL
Licht/RSM
Lied/MRST
lief/EVZ
lösbar/ACU
losgerissen/A
löten/DIVXY
lötet/G
Lübecker/NSF
Mäntel/MN
maßgeblich/AU
Mathematiker/FNS
mehlig/AC
meinen/DIVXY
meutert/G
Mieter/NSFV
missverständlich/AU
modern/DIVXY
Mohammedaner/FNS
mordet/G
multimedial/A
Münchner/FNS
Mündigkeit/U
musst/GW
Mütter/NM
nagt/G
napoleonisch/A
nehmen/DIV
neuer/L
Neuntklässler/NFS
niedergehalten/A
nötig/ACU
Ordnungshüter/FNS
organisch/ACU
paart/G
Packer/NSVF
Papstunterhändler/FNS
partitioniert/AU
peilt/G
Peiniger/FNS
pervers/A
Peter/SM
Pferd/EPTM
Pflanzung/PV
pinselt/G
Pionier/EFPS
pokert/G
Popsänger/FNS
pragmatisch/A
praktisch/ACU
predigt/G
Prinzessin/F
Problem/EPSM
pusten/DIVXY
putscht/G
putzig/A
quittiert/AU
radelt/G
raschelt/G
rastet/G
rätselt/G
Rat/TVS
rechnet/G
Rechtsanwälte/FN
Rechtsbewusstsein/SU
redet/G
regiert/A
rein/ACU
reißen/DIVX
rempelt/G
rosten/DIVXY
ruhig/ACU
rund/A
Salzfass/TM
sammeln/DIVXY
schaffen/DIVXYW
scharf/AU
scheuchen/DIVXY
Schiedsrichter/SNF
schiefgelacht/A
schiffen/BDIVXY
Schiff/EPSTM
schlang/VZ
schlendert/G
schleust/G
schlingen/DIVX
Schloss/TM
schlottert/G
schmatzt/G
Schmelzung/PV
schmerzt/G
schmunzelt/G
schnarcht/G
schneit/G
schnitt/VZ
Schraubung/VP
schreckt/G
Schrotthändler/FNS
schuldig/ACU
schulfrei/A
schwamm/VZ
schwatzt/G
Schwelger/FNS
schwitzt/G
schwor/VZ
selbstevident/A
selig/ACU
Setzung/PV
Siebziger/FNS
siecht/G
skaliert/AU
softwarekompatibel/A
söhnen/IVXY
sorgt/G
Sortimentsbuchhändler/FNS
spinnen/DIVX
Sportfreund/FPS
spüren/BDIVXY
staatsmännisch/A
statthaft/AU
staunt/G
stecken/BDIVXY
Stern/EMPST
steuern/BDIVXY
Stiefmütter/M
Stifter/FNS
Stopfung/PV
strahlt/G
Streuung/VP
strikt/A
Strukturiertheit/U
Stück/EPSTM
süß/ACL
Syrier/FNS
tapst/G
tatsächlich/A
tauschen/BDIVXY
Teil/JMST
Teppichknüpfer/FNS
Teufel/NSM
tief/ACU
Tier/EPSTUM
Tintenfass/TM
Töchter/MN
tragikomisch/A
Trapezkünstler/FNS
trat/VZ
trieb/VZ
Tüpfel/MS
Tür/EPM
typisch/ACU
üben/DIVXY
übergeordnet/A
überreich/AL
Übersetzer/FNS
umgeformt/A
unbedarft/A
ungelenk/A
unterbrochen/AU
unterschritten/AWX
urteilt/G
verboten/A
verbunden/AU
Verehrer/FNS
verfügbar/AU
verlagsüblich/A
Vermeidbarkeit/U
verschieden/ACL
Verschwörer/FNS
versöhnlich/AU
verständig/AC
verträglich/AU
vierwöchig/A
vollständig/AU
Vollstrecker/FNS
vorgeschossen/A
vornehm/ACL
wägbar/ACU
wahr/ACLU
Walnuss/pM
warf/VZ
warmherzig/AC
Wärter/FNS
Weib/EMT
weigert/G
weilen/DIVXY
Weinfass/TM
weiß/AL
weitläufig/AC
Werbeleiter/FNS
Wesen/HS
Wetter/SU
wickeln/DIVXY
wiedervereint/A
Wildschütze/FN
willkommen/ACU
wirren/DIVXY
Wühler/FNS
wundern/BDIVXY
würdevoll/AC
würdig/ACU
wütet/G
zehren/DIVXY
Zettel/NSM
ziegelrot/A
zittert/G
zögern/DIVXY
Züchter/FNS
Zufriedenheit/U
zugeschoben/A
zurückgezogen/AC
zutreffend/AU
zweigen/IVXY
